Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 2. State Vocational Rehabilitation Committee.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 57, SLA 2010 (SB 83), establishing the State Vocational Rehabilitation Committee in place of the former Governor’s Committee on Employment of People with Disabilities, see 2009 Senate Journal 77 — 78.

Sec. 23.15.220.
Purpose.

The purpose of AS

23.15.220

—

23.15.320

is to create a State Vocational Rehabilitation Committee for Alaska to carry on a continuing program to promote the employment of people of the state with disabilities by creating statewide interest in the rehabilitation and employment of people with disabilities, and by obtaining and maintaining cooperation with public and private groups and individuals in this field.

History.

(§ 1 ch 23 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 7 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 57 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective June 10, 2010, substituted “State Vocational Rehabilitation Committee” for “Governor’s Committee on Employment of People with Disabilities”.

Collateral references. —

Accommodation requirement under state legislation forbidding job discrimination on account of handicap. 76 ALR4th 310.

Handicap as job disqualification under state legislation forbidding job discrimination on account of handicap. 78 ALR4th 265.

Damages and other relief under state legislation forbidding job discrimination on account of handicap. 78 ALR4th 435.

What constitutes handicap under state legislation forbidding job discrimination on account of handicap. 82 ALR4th 26, 77 ALR5th 595.

When must specialized testing, training, or other work procedures be provided for benefit of qualified disabled employee or applicant to fulfill employer’s reasonable accommodation requirement. 127 ALR Fed. 559.

Action under Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C.A. §§ 12101 et seq.), to remedy alleged harassment or hostile work environment. 162 ALR Fed. 603.

Sec. 23.15.230.
Appointment of committee.

The governor shall appoint the members of the State Vocational Rehabilitation Committee for staggered terms not exceeding three years. The composition of the committee must be consistent with the requirements of 29 U.S.C. 725 and 3003, as amended. A member may be reappointed, and a vacancy shall be filled by the governor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 23 SLA 1960; am § 5 ch 168 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 57 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

For transitional provision relating to the continued service of members of the former Governor’s Committee on Employment of People with Disabilities as members of the State Vocational Rehabilitation Committee, as the committee is recomposed under this section, see § 5, ch. 57, SLA 2010, in the 2010 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective June 10, 2010, rewrote the section.

Sec. 23.15.240.
Selection and term of chair.

The members of the committee shall select a chair from among the voting members of the committee, subject to disapproval by the governor. The chair serves for one year or until a successor is selected.

History.

(§ 2 ch 23 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 7 SLA 1989; am § 3 ch 57 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective June 10, 2010, in the section heading substituted “Selection” for “Appointment”, and rewrote the section.

Sec. 23.15.250.
Compensation and expenses.

Members of the committee may receive no compensation for services on the committee but are entitled to reimbursement for necessary expenses in accordance with existing law.

History.

(§ 2 ch 23 SLA 1960)

Sec. 23.15.260.
Meetings.

The committee shall meet four times a year, but, at the request of the governor, special meetings may be called. Meetings may be conducted telephonically.

History.

(§ 2 ch 23 SLA 1960; am § 4 ch 57 SLA 2010)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2010 amendment, effective June 10, 2010, substituted “four times a year” for “annually”, and added the second sentence.

Sec. 23.15.270.
Cooperation with other committees and agencies.

The committee shall work in close cooperation with local committees and with the President’s Committee on Employment of People with Disabilities to carry out the purpose of AS

23.15.220

—

23.15.320

more effectively, and with state and federal agencies having responsibilities for employment and rehabilitation of people with disabilities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 23 SLA 1960; am § 7 ch 5 SLA 1978; am § 3 ch 7 SLA 1989)

Sec. 23.15.280.
Appointment of advisors.

The division of vocational rehabilitation, the State Employment Service, the Department of Health and Social Services, and other state agencies that the committee names shall each designate a staff member who shall meet with the committee and act in an advisory capacity. The federal Veterans Employment Service and the United States Department of Veterans Affairs shall each be invited to designate a member of their respective staffs to serve in this capacity with the committee. Agencies of the state shall provide the assistance to the committee that the committee requests to aid it in carrying out the purposes of AS

23.15.220

—

23.15.320

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 23 SLA 1960; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am § 79 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Sec. 23.15.290.
Employ people with disabilities week.

Each year the governor shall issue a proclamation designating the first full week in October as Alaska Employ People with Disabilities Week. During this week, appropriate ceremonies shall be held throughout the state for the purpose of enlisting public support for, and interest in the employment of, people with disabilities. The mayors of cities, and heads of government instrumentalities, and leaders of industry and business, educational, and religious groups, labor, veterans, women, farm, scientific and professional, and all other interested organizations and individuals shall be invited to participate.

History.

(§ 4 ch 23 SLA 1960; am § 8 ch 5 SLA 1978; am § 4 ch 7 SLA 1989)

Sec. 23.15.300.
Manner of handling funds.

Funds to carry out AS

23.15.220

—

23.15.320

shall be appropriated, expended, and accounted for through the same procedures as funds for operation of the Department of Labor and Workforce Development.

History.

(§ 5 ch 23 SLA 1960; am § 90 ch 58 SLA 1999)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in this section, “Department of Labor” was changed to “Department of Labor and Workforce Development” in accordance with § 90, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Sec. 23.15.310.
Gifts.

The committee may accept property by gift, devise, bequest, or otherwise to carry out the purposes of AS

23.15.220

—

23.15.320

.

History.

(§ 6 ch 23 SLA 1960)

Sec. 23.15.315.
Fees.

The committee may charge a fee for attendance at a conference, workshop, or similar event conducted by the committee, based on the estimated cost to the committee of organizing and holding the event.

The receipt and expenditure by the committee of fees authorized by this section is subject to AS

23.15.300

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 18 SLA 1992)

Legislative history reports. —

For Governor’s transmittal letter in connection with the enactment of this section by § 1, ch. 18, SLA 1992 (SB 347), see 1992 Senate Journal 1787.

Sec. 23.15.320.
Annual report to governor.

The committee shall annually report its activities during the preceding year to the governor.

History.

(§ 7 ch 23 SLA 1960)